Washington statutes.
RCW 35.83.080

State public body support.

For the purpose of aiding the board of commissioners of a housing authority in carrying out the board's duties or powers under any applicable law, any state public body may, with or without consideration, provide monetary, in-kind, or other support to the board of commissioners of a housing authority. Such support may not be for the purpose of compensation for a commissioner for his or her services rendered to the housing authority.

[ 2018 c 42 s 1.]